Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1011
Time of taking effect.

The Uniform Premarital Agreement Act takes effect on July 16, 1994, and applies to any premarital agreement executed on or after that date.

Laws 1994, LB 202, § 11.